Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2205
Appraisal Foundation, defined.

Appraisal Foundation means The Appraisal Foundation that was incorporated as an Illinois not-for-profit corporation on November 30, 1987.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 17;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 5.